test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ot_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ot: # Noun 'house' - full paradigm
     ot+N+Sg: ot
     ot+N+Sg+DemDistal: odcha
     ot+N+Sg+DemProx: odno
     ot+N+Sg+DemEgo: odni
     ot+N+Sg+PxSg1: oda
     ot+N+Sg+PxSg2: odi
     ot+N+Sg+PxSg3: ode
     ot+N+Sg+PxPl1: odwa
     ot+N+Sg+PxPl2: odu
     ot+N+Sg+PxPl3: odgi

     ot+N+Pl: ute
     ot+N+Pl+DemDistal: uteka
     ot+N+Pl+DemProx: utego
     ot+N+Pl+DemEgo: utegi
     ot+N+Pl+PxSg1: utena
     ot+N+Pl+PxSg2: uteni
     ot+N+Pl+PxSg3: utene
     ot+N+Pl+PxPl1: utewa
     ot+N+Pl+PxPl2: uteu
     ot+N+Pl+PxPl3: utegi
